Utah statutes.
72-9-702.   Existing rights of action unaffected -- Penalties cumulative.
(1) This chapter may not be construed to have the effect of releasing or
waiving any right of action by the state, the department or any person for any
right, penalty, or forfeiture which may have arisen or occurred under any law
of this state before May 10, 1983, or which arises or occurs after May 10,
1983.
(2)  All penalties accruing under this chapter are cumulative, and a suit for
the recovery of one penalty is not a bar to and shall not affect the recovery
of any other penalty or forfeiture, and is not a bar to any criminal
prosecution against any motor carrier, or any officer, director, agent, or
employee of a motor carrier, or any other corporation or person, or a bar to
the exercise by the department, through the court, of its power to punish for
contempt.
